test/src/morphology/N-keera_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kēra: # Noun 43 'eng /est kiri/fin' - full paradigm
     kēra+N+Sg+Nom: kēra
     kēra+N+Sg+Gen: kēra
     kēra+N+Sg+Par: kerrõ
     kēra+N+Sg+Dat: kēran
     kēra+N+Sg+Ins: kēraks
     kēra+N+Sg+Ill: kerrõ
     kēra+N+Sg+Ela: kērast
     kēra+N+Pl+Nom: kērad
     kēra+N+Pl+Gen: kērad
     kēra+N+Pl+Par: kēridi
     kēra+N+Pl+Dat: kēradõn
     kēra+N+Pl+Ins: kēradõks
     kēra+N+Pl+Ill: kēriž
     kēra+N+Pl+Ela: kērist
